North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 35. Cheatham-White Scholarships.

§ 116-290.
Cheatham-White Scholarships; establishment and purpose; benefits.

Scholarships Established; Purpose. — The Cheatham-White Scholarships are established as a merit scholarship program at North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University and at North Carolina Central University. The purpose of the scholarships is to provide an outstanding educational experience for students who are exceptional scholars, versatile and well-rounded individuals with a broad range of interests, and who are accomplished and proficient in areas of both the arts and the sciences. They must also demonstrate leadership potential and a strong commitment to service.

Scholarship Benefits. — Each scholarship is a fully funded four-year scholarship that covers the cost of all of the following: full tuition, student fees, housing, meals, textbooks, a laptop, supplies, travel, and personal expenses. Each scholarship also provides four summers of fully funded enrichment and networking opportunities that may include international travel and study.

Number of Scholarships Awarded. — Up to 50 scholarships, 40 for resident students and 10 for nonresident students, may be awarded each academic year to students admitted to North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University. Up to 50 scholarships, 40 for resident students and 10 for nonresident students, may be awarded each academic year to students admitted to North Carolina Central University.

History.

2016-94, s. 11.4(e).

§ 116-291.
Cheatham-White Scholarships; fund established; administration of fund.

Fund Established. — There is established the Cheatham-White Scholarships Fund to be used to fund scholarships awarded pursuant to this Article. Both private and public funds may be solicited in the creation of the fund.

Matching Funds. — The funds appropriated each fiscal year to the Cheatham-White Scholarships Fund shall be matched by non-State funds and disbursed pursuant to

G.S. 143C-4-5

.

Administration of Fund. — The University of North Carolina System Office shall administer the Cheatham-White Scholarships Fund and the Cheatham-White Scholarships program.

History.

2016-94, s. 11.4(e); 2018-12, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-12, s. 11, effective July 1, 2018, substituted “System Office” for “General Administration” in subsection (c).

§ 116-292.
Cheatham-White Scholarships; eligibility and selection criteria.

Eligibility. — To be eligible to be nominated as a potential candidate for a Cheatham-White Scholarship, a person must satisfy all of the following criteria:

Be a competitive applicant for admission as a freshman in the fall semester into a baccalaureate program at either North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University or North Carolina Central University.

Be a United States citizen or permanent resident.

Be on course to graduate from high school in the spring semester prior to college admission.

Selection Criteria. — Candidates for Cheatham-White Scholarships shall be selected on the basis of academic merit, honorable character, outstanding leadership potential, and a demonstrable commitment to service. Financial need shall not be a consideration.

History.

2016-94, s. 11.4(e).

§ 116-293.
Cheatham-White Scholarships; school nomination of candidates.

All North Carolina high schools are eligible to nominate a student to be considered as a candidate for a Cheatham-White Scholarship. For purposes of this section, a high school includes a public school under the direction of a local board of education, a charter school, a regional school, a high school operated as part of The University of North Carolina, a school operated by the Department of Health and Human Services, a school operated by the State Board of Education, or a nonpublic school regulated under Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.

The number of nominees from each school is determined by the size of the senior class as follows:

Up to 199 seniors . . . . . 2 nominees.

200-399 seniors . . . . . 3 nominees.

400-499 seniors . . . . . 4 nominees.

500 or more seniors . . . . . 5 nominees.

History.

2016-94, s. 11.4(e).

§ 116-294.
Cheatham-White Scholarships; administration of scholarships.

The University of North Carolina System Office shall administer the Cheatham-White Scholarships, in consultation and collaboration with North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University and North Carolina Central University, pursuant to policies adopted by the Board of Trustees of both constituent institutions. As part of its administrative responsibilities, The University of North Carolina System Office, in consultation and collaboration with North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University and North Carolina Central University, shall do all of the following:

Design and implement an application and school nomination process to be used to identify potential scholarship candidates and a process for awarding the scholarships.

Develop a direct nomination process, in addition to the school nomination process, that allows a student to nominate himself or herself to be considered as a candidate for the scholarship in certain circumstances.

Define and describe more fully the selection criteria to be considered when choosing a scholarship candidate and recipient.

Identify the parties that will (i) evaluate scholarship applications and nominations and (ii) determine which candidates shall be awarded scholarships.

Design the framework and add the necessary substantive detail for the scholarship program, including courses of study that will be available, summer enrichment programs, and other extraordinary educational opportunities, and oversee its implementation.

Establish a mentoring and networking system for scholarship recipients.

Administer the Cheatham-White Scholarships Fund.

Establish a Cheatham-White Scholarships alumni association and network.

Any other function necessary for the successful implementation of the Cheatham-White Scholarships program and administration of the Cheatham-White Scholarships Fund.

History.

2016-94, s. 11.4(e); 2018-12, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-12, s. 12, effective July 1, 2018, substituted “System Office” for “General Administration” twice in the introductory paragraph.